Illinois, session 104th, SB3814.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 5changing Sections 21-101, 21-102, and 21-102.5 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 5/21-101)  (from Ch. 110, par. 21-101)7    Sec. 21-101. Proceedings; parties. 8    (a) If any person who is a resident of this State desires 9to assume another name by which to be afterwards called and 10known, the person may file a petition requesting that relief 11in the circuit court of the county wherein the petitioner he or 12she resides. The petitioner shall have resided in this State 13for 3 months at the time of the name change hearing or entry of 14an order granting the name change. 15    (b) A person who has been convicted of any offense for 16which a person is required to register under the Sex Offender 17Registration Act, the Murderer and Violent Offender Against 18Youth Registration Act, or the Arsonist Registry Act in this 19State or any other state and who has not been pardoned is not 20permitted to file a petition for a name change in the courts of 21this State during the period that the person is required to 22register, unless that person verifies under oath, as provided 23under Section 1-109, that the petition for the name change is   SB3814- 2 -LRB104 18107 JRC 31546 b1due to marriage, religious beliefs, status as a victim of 2trafficking or gender-related identity as defined by the 3Illinois Human Rights Act. A judge may grant or deny the 4request for legal name change filed by such persons upon 5making a determination based on the following factors: the 6health and safety of the individual making the request, the 7potential harm to the individual making the request if the 8name change is denied, and any specific and detailed facts 9demonstrating that the risk to an individual or group would 10outweigh the harm to the individual making the request for the 11name change. Any denial of a name change to someone under this 12subsection who is making the request based on marriage, 13religious beliefs, or status as a victim of trafficking or 14gender-related identity shall be in writing stating the 15reasons for the denial. Any such persons granted a legal name 16change shall report the change to the law enforcement agency 17having jurisdiction of their current registration pursuant to 18the Duty to Report requirements specified in Section 20 of the 19Murderer and Violent Offender Against Youth Registration Act 20and Section 6 of the Sex Offender Registration Act. For the 21purposes of this subsection, a person will not face a felony 22charge if the person's request for legal name change is denied 23without proof of perjury.24    (b-1) A person who has been convicted as an adult of a 25felony offense in this State or any other state and whose 26sentence has not been completed, terminated, or discharged is   SB3814- 3 -LRB104 18107 JRC 31546 b1not permitted to file a petition for a name change in the 2courts of this State unless that person is pardoned for the 3offense.4    (c) A petitioner may include the petitioner's spouse and 5adult unmarried children, with their consent, and the 6petitioner's minor children where it appears to the court that 7it is for their best interest, in the petition and relief 8requested, and the court's order shall then include the spouse 9and children. Whenever any minor has resided in the family of 10any person for the space of 3 years and has been recognized and 11known as an adopted child in the family of that person, the 12application herein provided for may be made by the person 13having that minor in that person's family.14    An order shall be entered as to a minor only if the court 15finds by clear and convincing evidence that the change is 16necessary to serve the best interest of the child. In 17determining the best interest of a minor child under this 18Section, the court shall consider all relevant factors, 19including:20        (1) The wishes of the child's parents and any person 21    acting as a parent who has physical custody of the child.22        (2) The wishes of the child and the reasons for those 23    wishes. The court may interview the child in chambers to 24    ascertain the child's wishes with respect to the change of 25    name. Counsel shall be present at the interview unless 26    otherwise agreed upon by the parties. The court shall   SB3814- 4 -LRB104 18107 JRC 31546 b1    cause a court reporter to be present who shall make a 2    complete record of the interview instantaneously to be 3    part of the record in the case.4        (3) The interaction and interrelationship of the child 5    with the child's parents or persons acting as parents who 6    have physical custody of the child, step-parents, 7    siblings, step-siblings, or any other person who may 8    significantly affect the child's best interest.9        (4) The child's adjustment to the child's home, 10    school, and community.11    (d) If it appears to the court that the conditions and 12requirements under this Article have been complied with and 13that there is no reason why the relief requested should not be 14granted, the court, by an order to be entered of record, may 15direct and provide that the name of that person be changed in 16accordance with the relief requested in the petition. If the 17circuit court orders that a name change be granted to a person 18who has been adjudicated or convicted of a felony or 19misdemeanor offense under the laws of this State or any other 20state for which the conviction has not been pardoned, 21expunged, or sealed, a pardon has not been granted, or has an 22arrest for which a charge has not been filed or a pending 23charge on a felony or misdemeanor offense, a copy of the order, 24including a copy of each applicable access and review 25response, shall be forwarded to the Illinois State Police. The 26Illinois State Police shall update any Illinois criminal   SB3814- 5 -LRB104 18107 JRC 31546 b1history transcript or Illinois offender registration of each 2person 18 years of age or older in the order to include the 3change of name as well as the petitioner's his or her former 4name. 5(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-1133, eff. 1-1-24; 6103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-609, eff. 7-1-24; 103-1063, eff. 73-1-25.) 8    (735 ILCS 5/21-102)  (from Ch. 110, par. 21-102)9    Sec. 21-102. Petition; order. update criminal history 10transcript. 11    (a) The petition shall be a statewide standardized form 12approved by the Illinois Supreme Court and shall set forth the 13name then held, the name sought to be assumed, the residence of 14the petitioner, the length of time the petitioner has resided 15in this State, and the state or country of the petitioner's 16nativity or supposed nativity. The petition shall include a 17statement, verified under oath as provided under Section 1-109 18of this Code, whether or not the petitioner or any other person 1918 years of age or older who will be subject to a change of 20name under the petition if granted: (1) has been adjudicated 21or convicted as an adult of a felony or misdemeanor offense 22under the laws of this State or any other state for which the 23conviction has not been pardoned, expunged, or sealed a pardon 24has not been granted; or (2) has an arrest as an adult for 25which a charge has not been filed or a pending adult charge on   SB3814- 6 -LRB104 18107 JRC 31546 b1a felony or misdemeanor offense. The petition shall be signed 2by the person petitioning or, in case of minors, by the parent 3or guardian having the legal custody of the minor.4    (b) The order for change of name shall recite the place and 5date of birth of the petitioner. The place of birth shall 6include the city, state, and country of birth. If the 7statement provided under subsection (a) of this Section 8indicates the petitioner or any other person 18 years of age or 9older who will be subject to a change of name under the 10petition, if granted, has been adjudicated or convicted of a 11felony or misdemeanor offense under the laws of this State or 12any other state for which a pardon has not been granted, or has 13an arrest for which a charge has not been filed or a pending 14charge on a felony or misdemeanor offense, the State's 15Attorney may request the court to or the court may on its own 16motion, require the person, prior to a hearing on the 17petition, to initiate an update of his or her criminal history 18transcript with the Illinois State Police. The Illinois State 19Police shall allow a person to use the Access and Review 20process, established by rule in the Illinois State Police, for 21this purpose. Upon completion of the update of the criminal 22history transcript, the petitioner shall file confirmation of 23each update with the court, which shall seal the records from 24disclosure outside of court proceedings on the petition. 25    (c) Any petition filed under subsection (a) shall include 26the following: "WARNING: If you are required to register under   SB3814- 7 -LRB104 18107 JRC 31546 b1the Sex Offender Registration Act, the Murderer and Violent 2Offender Against Youth Registration Act, or the Arsonist 3Registry Act in this State or a similar law in any other state 4and have not been pardoned, you will be committing a felony 5under those respective Acts by seeking a change of name during 6the registration period UNLESS your request for legal name 7change is due to marriage, religious beliefs, status as a 8victim of trafficking or gender related identity as defined by 9the Illinois Human Rights Act.". 10(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-1133, eff. 1-1-24; 11103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-609, eff. 7-1-24.) 12    (735 ILCS 5/21-102.5)13    Sec. 21-102.5. Notice; objection.14    (a) The circuit court clerk shall promptly serve a copy of 15the petition on the State's Attorney and the Illinois State 16Police if the statement provided under subsection (a) of 17Section 21-102 indicates that the petitioner, or any other 18person 18 years of age or older who will be subject to a change 19of name under the petition, has been adjudicated or convicted 20as an adult of a felony or misdemeanor offense under the laws 21of this State or any other state for which the conviction has 22not been pardoned, expunged, or sealed a pardon has not been 23granted, or has an arrest as an adult for which a charge has 24not been filed or a pending adult charge on a felony or 25misdemeanor offense.  SB3814- 8 -LRB104 18107 JRC 31546 b1    (b) The State's Attorney may file an objection to the 2petition within 30 days of the date of service of the petition 3upon the State's Attorney if the petitioner has been convicted 4of identity theft, aggravated identity theft, felony or 5misdemeanor criminal sexual abuse if the victim of the offense 6at the time of its commission is under 18 years of age, felony 7or misdemeanor sexual exploitation of a child, felony or 8misdemeanor indecent solicitation of a child, or felony or 9misdemeanor indecent solicitation of an adult and has not been 10pardoned for the conviction or has a pending case for any of 11these enumerated charges or any pending charge that would 12require compliance, if convicted, with the Sex Offender 13Registration Act, the Murderer and Violent Offender Against 14Youth Registration Act, or the Arsonist Registry Act. All 15objections shall be in writing, shall be filed with the 16circuit court clerk, shall be served upon the petitioner, and 17shall state with specificity the basis of the objection, 18including, but not limited to, any evidence of specific 19nefarious intent for requesting the name change and any 20specific and detailed facts demonstrating that any potential 21risk to another individual or group would outweigh any 22potential harm or negative impact to the individual making the 23request for the name change. Objections to a petition must be 24filed within 30 days of the date of service of the petition 25upon the State's Attorney if the petitioner:26        (1) is the defendant in a pending criminal offense   SB3814- 9 -LRB104 18107 JRC 31546 b1    charge; or2        (2) has been convicted of identity theft, aggravated 3    identity theft, felony or misdemeanor criminal sexual 4    abuse when the victim of the offense at the time of its 5    commission is under 18 years of age, felony or misdemeanor 6    sexual exploitation of a child, felony or misdemeanor 7    indecent solicitation of a child, or felony or misdemeanor 8    indecent solicitation of an adult, and has not been 9    pardoned for the conviction.10(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-1133, eff. 1-1-24; 11103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)